Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the
General Fund, the Veterans’ Services Fund, to be administered by the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services. Interest earned by  the fund is credited to the fund. Pursuant to
Article XV, section 4f, of  the Oregon Constitution, one and one-half percent of the net pro-
ceeds from the Oregon State Lottery shall be deposited in the Veterans’ Services Fund. All
moneys transferred from the State Lottery Fund and all  other moneys authorized to be
transferred to  the Veterans’ Services Fund from whatever source are appropriated contin-
uously to provide services for the benefit of veterans.
SECTION 2.
(1) On December 31 in each odd-numbered year, all amounts remaining un-
spent by a state agency  from statutory allocations made from the Veterans’ Services Fund
to that agency for the prior biennium shall revert to the Veterans’ Services Fund.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to allocations for debt service, capital
construction, continuing contracts, contested claims or special allocations designated  by
legislative action.
SECTION 3. The Veterans’ Department of Veterans’ Affairs  Dedicated Lottery Fund is
established in the State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General Fund. The
Veterans’ Department of Veterans’ Affairs Dedicated Lottery  Fund consists of moneys allo-
cated or transferred to the  fund from the Veterans’ Services Fund established under section
1 of this 2017 Act. The moneys in the Veterans’ Department of Veterans’ Affairs Dedicated
Lottery Fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs to  pro-
vide services for the benefit of veterans. Moneys in the fund may  be used only for purposes
for which moneys in the Veterans’ Services Fund may  be used under section 1 of this 2017
Act and Article XV, section 4f, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 4.
The Veterans’ Housing and Community Services Department  Dedicated
Lottery Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate and  distinct from the General
Fund. The  Veterans’ Housing and Community Services Department Dedicated Lottery Fund
consists of moneys allocated or transferred to the fund from the  Veterans’ Services Fund
established under section 1 of this 2017  Act or from the Veterans’ Department of Veterans’
Affairs Dedicated Lottery Fund established under section 3 of this 2017 Act. The moneys in
the Veterans’ Housing and Community  Services Department Dedicated Lottery Fund are
Enrolled Senate Bill 140 (SB 140-A) Page 1
continuously appropriated to the Housing  and Community Services Department to provide
services for the benefit of veterans. Moneys in the  fund may be used only for purposes for
which moneys in the Veterans’ Services Fund may be used under section 1 of this  2017 Act
and Article XV, section 4f, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 5. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by Senate June 22, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 28, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 140 (SB 140-A) Page 2